Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.52, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Sentence. Whoever commits theft may be sentenced as follows: (1) to imprisonment for not more than 20 years or to payment of a fine of not more than $100,000, or both, if the property is a firearm, or the value of the property or services stolen is more than $35,000 and the conviction is for a violation of subdivision 2, new text begin paragraph (a), new text end clause (3), (4), (15), (16), or (19), or section 609.2335, subdivision 1, clause (1) or (2), item (i); or (2) to imprisonment for not more than ten years or to payment of a fine of not more than $20,000, or both, if new text begin any of the following circumstances exist:new text end new text begin (i) new text end the value of the property or services stolen exceeds $5,000deleted text begin , or ifdeleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (ii)new text end the property stolen wasnew text begin :new text end new text begin (A)new text end an article representing a trade secretdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (B)new text end an explosive or incendiary devicedeleted text begin , ordeleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (C)new text end a controlled substance listed in Schedule I or II pursuant to section 152.02 with the exception of marijuana; or new text begin (D) a motor vehicle; or new text end (3) to imprisonment for not more than five years or to payment of a fine of not more than $10,000, or both, if any of the following circumstances exist: deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (i)new text end the value of the property or services stolen is more than $1,000 but not more than $5,000; or deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (ii)new text end the property stolen was a controlled substance listed in Schedule III, IV, or V pursuant to section 152.02; or deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (iii)new text end the value of the property or services stolen is more than $500 but not more than $1,000 and the person has been convicted within the preceding five years for an offense under this section, section 256.98; 268.182; 609.24; 609.245; 609.247; 609.522; 609.53; 609.582, subdivision 1, 2, or 3; 609.625; 609.63; 609.631; or 609.821, or a statute from another state, the United States, or a foreign jurisdiction, in conformity with any of those sections, and the person received a felony or gross misdemeanor sentence for the offense, or a sentence that was stayed under section 609.135 if the offense to which a plea was entered would allow imposition of a felony or gross misdemeanor sentence; or deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (iv)new text end the value of the property or services stolen is not more than $1,000, and any of the following circumstances exist: deleted text begin (i)deleted text end new text begin (A)new text end the property is taken from the person of another or from a corpse, or grave or coffin containing a corpse; or deleted text begin (ii)deleted text end new text begin (B)new text end the property is a record of a court or officer, or a writing, instrument or record kept, filed or deposited according to law with or in the keeping of any public officer or office; or deleted text begin (iii)deleted text end new text begin (C)new text end the property is taken from a burning, abandoned, or vacant building or upon its removal therefrom, or from an area of destruction caused by civil disaster, riot, bombing, or the proximity of battle; or deleted text begin (iv)deleted text end new text begin (D)new text end the property consists of public funds belonging to the state or to any political subdivision or agency thereof; or deleted text begin (v) the property stolen is a motor vehicle; or deleted text end (4) to imprisonment for not more than 364 days or to payment of a fine of not more than $3,000, or both, if the value of the property or services stolen is more than $500 but not more than $1,000; or (5) in all other cases where the value of the property or services stolen is $500 or less, to imprisonment for not more than 90 days or to payment of a fine of not more than $1,000, or both, provided, however, in any prosecution under subdivision 2, new text begin paragraph (a), new text end clauses (1), (2), (3), (4), (13), and (19), the value of the money or property or services received by the defendant in violation of any one or more of the above provisions within any six-month period may be aggregated and the defendant charged accordingly in applying the provisions of this subdivision; provided that when two or more offenses are committed by the same person in two or more counties, the accused may be prosecuted in any county in which one of the offenses was committed for all of the offenses aggregated under this paragraph. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The revisor of statutes, in consultation with the House Research Department and the Office of Senate Counsel, Research and Fiscal Analysis, shall make cross-reference changes to Minnesota Statutes, section 609.52, in Minnesota Statutes and Minnesota Rules. new text end